District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

38-1957

Additional leaves in emergencies.

Repealed.

Oct. 13, 1949, 63 Stat. 843, ch. 686, § 4
Oct. 29, 1951, 65 Stat. 660, ch. 601, § 3
Dec. 18, 1967, 81 Stat. 659, Pub. L. 90-212, § 1(c)
Feb. 19, 1976, D.C. Law 1-47, § 2, 22 DCR 4683
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-78, § 18, 29 DCR 49
1981 Ed., § 31-1025.
1973 Ed., § 31-694.